Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-348
Bonds; sale; record.

The secretary shall keep a record of the bonds sold, their number, the date of sale, the price received, and the name of the purchaser.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 20, p. 626;

Laws 1907, c. 152, § 5, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 1843;

C.S.1922, § 1790;

C.S.1929, § 31-447;

R.S.1943, § 31-348.